Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,120.01
County resolution or city ordinance prohibiting smoking; not applicable to cigar shops.

No county resolution or city ordinance that prohibits smoking in indoor areas shall apply to cigar shops.

Laws 2009, LB355, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB118, § 7.